Illinois, session 104th, HB4790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be referred to as the 5Voter Choice and Fair Access Act. 6    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 7Sections 7-12 and 10-8 and by adding Section 7-12.5 as 8follows: 9    (10 ILCS 5/7-12)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-12)10    Sec. 7-12. All petitions for nomination shall be filed by 11mail or in person as follows:12        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, where 13    the nomination is to be made for a State, congressional, 14    or judicial office, or for any office a nomination for 15    which is made for a territorial division or district which 16    comprises more than one county or is partly in one county 17    and partly in another county or counties (including the 18    Fox Metro Water Reclamation District), then, except as 19    otherwise provided in this Section, such petition for 20    nomination shall be filed in the principal office of the 21    State Board of Elections not more than 141 and not less 22    than 134 days prior to the date of the primary, but, in the   HB4790- 2 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    case of petitions for nomination to fill a vacancy by 2    special election in the office of representative in 3    Congress from this State, such petition for nomination 4    shall be filed in the principal office of the State Board 5    of Elections not more than 85 days and not less than 82 6    days prior to the date of the primary.7        Where a vacancy occurs in the office of Supreme, 8    Appellate or Circuit Court Judge within the 3-week period 9    preceding the 134th day before a general primary election, 10    petitions for nomination for the office in which the 11    vacancy has occurred shall be filed in the principal 12    office of the State Board of Elections not more than 120 13    nor less than 113 days prior to the date of the general 14    primary election.15        Where the nomination is to be made for delegates or 16    alternate delegates to a national nominating convention, 17    then such petition for nomination shall be filed in the 18    principal office of the State Board of Elections not more 19    than 141 and not less than 134 days prior to the date of 20    the primary; provided, however, that if the rules or 21    policies of a national political party conflict with such 22    requirements for filing petitions for nomination for 23    delegates or alternate delegates to a national nominating 24    convention, the chair of the State central committee of 25    such national political party shall notify the Board in 26    writing, citing by reference the rules or policies of the   HB4790- 3 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    national political party in conflict, and in such case the 2    Board shall direct such petitions to be filed in 3    accordance with the delegate selection plan adopted by the 4    state central committee of such national political party.5        (1.1) Where the nomination is to be made for a State, 6    congressional, or judicial office, or for any office a 7    nomination for which is made for a territorial division or 8    district which comprises more than one county or is partly 9    in one county and partly in another county or counties 10    (including the Fox Metro Water Reclamation District), and 11    a candidate is the current holder of the elective office 12    for which nomination papers are to be filed, then, except 13    as otherwise provided in this Section, such petition for 14    nomination shall be filed in the principal office of the 15    State Board of Elections not more than 148 and not less 16    than 141 days prior to the date of the primary. 17        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2.1), 18    where Where the nomination is to be made for a county 19    office or trustee of a sanitary district then such 20    petition shall be filed in the office of the county clerk 21    not more than 141 nor less than 134 days prior to the date 22    of the primary.23        (2.1) Where the nomination is to be made for a county 24    office or trustee of a sanitary district and a candidate 25    is the current holder of the elective office for which 26    nomination papers are to be filed, then such petition   HB4790- 4 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    shall be filed in the office of the county clerk not more 2    than 148 nor less than 141 days prior to the date of the 3    primary. 4        (3) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3.1), 5    where Where the nomination is to be made for a municipal or 6    township office, such petitions for nomination shall be 7    filed in the office of the local election official, not 8    more than 127 nor less than 120 days prior to the date of 9    the primary; provided, where a municipality's or 10    township's boundaries are coextensive with or are entirely 11    within the jurisdiction of a municipal board of election 12    commissioners, the petitions shall be filed in the office 13    of such board; and provided, that petitions for the office 14    of multi-township assessor shall be filed with the 15    election authority.16        (3.1) Where the nomination is to be made for a 17    municipal or township office and a candidate is the 18    current holder of the elective office for which nomination 19    papers are to be filed, such petitions for nomination 20    shall be filed in the office of the local election 21    official, not more than 134 nor less than 127 days prior to 22    the date of the primary; provided, where a municipality's 23    or township's boundaries are coextensive with or are 24    entirely within the jurisdiction of a municipal board of 25    election commissioners, the petitions shall be filed in 26    the office of such board; and provided, that petitions for   HB4790- 5 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    the office of multi-township assessor shall be filed with 2    the election authority. 3        (4) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4.1), 4    the The petitions of candidates for State central 5    committeeperson shall be filed in the principal office of 6    the State Board of Elections not more than 141 nor less 7    than 134 days prior to the date of the primary.8        (4.1) Where a candidate is the current central 9    committeeperson for which nomination papers are to be 10    filed, the petitions of candidates for State central 11    committeeperson shall be filed in the principal office of 12    the State Board of Elections not more than 148 nor less 13    than 141 days prior to the date of the primary. 14        (5) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (5.1), 15    petitions Petitions of candidates for precinct, township 16    or ward committeepersons shall be filed in the office of 17    the county clerk not more than 141 nor less than 134 days 18    prior to the date of the primary.19        (5.1) Where a candidate is the current committeeperson 20    for which nomination papers are to be filed, petitions of 21    candidates for precinct, township or ward committeepersons 22    shall be filed in the office of the county clerk not more 23    than 148 nor less than 141 days prior to the date of the 24    primary. 25        (6) The State Board of Elections and the various 26    election authorities and local election officials with   HB4790- 6 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    whom such petitions for nominations are filed shall 2    specify the place where filings shall be made and upon 3    receipt shall endorse thereon the day and hour on which 4    each petition was filed. All petitions filed by persons 5    waiting in line as of 8:00 a.m. on the first day for 6    filing, or as of the normal opening hour of the office 7    involved on such day, shall be deemed filed as of 8:00 a.m. 8    or the normal opening hour, as the case may be. Petitions 9    filed by mail and received after midnight of the first day 10    for filing and in the first mail delivery or pickup of that 11    day shall be deemed as filed as of 8:00 a.m. of that day or 12    as of the normal opening hour of such day, as the case may 13    be. All petitions received thereafter shall be deemed as 14    filed in the order of actual receipt. However, 2 or more 15    petitions filed within the last hour of the filing 16    deadline shall be deemed filed simultaneously. Where 2 or 17    more petitions are received simultaneously, the State 18    Board of Elections or the various election authorities or 19    local election officials with whom such petitions are 20    filed shall break ties and determine the order of filing, 21    by means of a lottery or other fair and impartial method of 22    random selection approved by the State Board of Elections. 23    Such lottery shall be conducted within 9 days following 24    the last day for petition filing and shall be open to the 25    public. Seven days written notice of the time and place of 26    conducting such random selection shall be given by the   HB4790- 7 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    State Board of Elections to the chair of the State central 2    committee of each established political party, and by each 3    election authority or local election official, to the 4    County Chair of each established political party, and to 5    each organization of citizens within the election 6    jurisdiction which was entitled, under this Article, at 7    the next preceding election, to have pollwatchers present 8    on the day of election. The State Board of Elections, 9    election authority or local election official shall post 10    in a conspicuous, open and public place, at the entrance 11    of the office, notice of the time and place of such 12    lottery. The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules 13    and regulations governing the procedures for the conduct 14    of such lottery. All candidates shall be certified in the 15    order in which their petitions have been filed. Where 16    candidates have filed simultaneously, they shall be 17    certified in the order determined by lot and prior to 18    candidates who filed for the same office at a later time.19        (7) The State Board of Elections or the appropriate 20    election authority or local election official with whom 21    such a petition for nomination is filed shall notify the 22    person for whom a petition for nomination has been filed 23    of the obligation to file statements of organization, 24    reports of campaign contributions, and quarterly reports 25    of campaign contributions and expenditures under Article 9 26    of this Code. Such notice shall be given in the manner   HB4790- 8 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    prescribed by paragraph (7) of Section 9-16 of this Code.2        (8) Nomination papers filed under this Section are not 3    valid if the candidate named therein fails to file a 4    statement of economic interests as required by the 5    Illinois Governmental Ethics Act in relation to his 6    candidacy with the appropriate officer by the end of the 7    period for the filing of nomination papers unless he has 8    filed a statement of economic interests in relation to the 9    same governmental unit with that officer within a year 10    preceding the date on which such nomination papers were 11    filed. If the nomination papers of any candidate and the 12    statement of economic interests of that candidate are not 13    required to be filed with the same officer, the candidate 14    must file with the officer with whom the nomination papers 15    are filed a receipt from the officer with whom the 16    statement of economic interests is filed showing the date 17    on which such statement was filed. Such receipt shall be 18    so filed not later than the last day on which nomination 19    papers may be filed.20        (9) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, any 21    person for whom a petition for nomination, or for 22    committeeperson or for delegate or alternate delegate to a 23    national nominating convention has been filed may cause 24    his name to be withdrawn by request in writing, signed by 25    him and duly acknowledged before an officer qualified to 26    take acknowledgments of deeds, and filed in the principal   HB4790- 9 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    or permanent branch office of the State Board of Elections 2    or with the appropriate election authority or local 3    election official, not later than the date of 4    certification of candidates for the consolidated primary 5    or general primary ballot. No names so withdrawn shall be 6    certified or printed on the primary ballot. If petitions 7    for nomination have been filed for the same person with 8    respect to more than one political party, his name shall 9    not be certified nor printed on the primary ballot of any 10    party. If petitions for nomination have been filed for the 11    same person for 2 or more offices which are incompatible 12    so that the same person could not serve in more than one of 13    such offices if elected, that person must withdraw as a 14    candidate for all but one of such offices within the 5 15    business days following the last day for petition filing. 16    A candidate in a judicial election may file petitions for 17    nomination for only one vacancy in a subcircuit and only 18    one vacancy in a circuit in any one filing period, and if 19    petitions for nomination have been filed for the same 20    person for 2 or more vacancies in the same circuit or 21    subcircuit in the same filing period, his or her name 22    shall be certified only for the first vacancy for which 23    the petitions for nomination were filed. If he fails to 24    withdraw as a candidate for all but one of such offices 25    within such time his name shall not be certified, nor 26    printed on the primary ballot, for any office. For the   HB4790- 10 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    purpose of the foregoing provisions, an office in a 2    political party is not incompatible with any other office.3        (10)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other 4    statute, no primary shall be held for an established 5    political party in any township, municipality, or ward 6    thereof, where the nomination of such party for every 7    office to be voted upon by the electors of such township, 8    municipality, or ward thereof, is uncontested. Whenever a 9    political party's nomination of candidates is uncontested 10    as to one or more, but not all, of the offices to be voted 11    upon by the electors of a township, municipality, or ward 12    thereof, then a primary shall be held for that party in 13    such township, municipality, or ward thereof; provided 14    that the primary ballot shall not include those offices 15    within such township, municipality, or ward thereof, for 16    which the nomination is uncontested. For purposes of this 17    Article, the nomination of an established political party 18    of a candidate for election to an office shall be deemed to 19    be uncontested where not more than the number of persons 20    to be nominated have timely filed valid nomination papers 21    seeking the nomination of such party for election to such 22    office.23        (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other 24    statute, no primary election shall be held for an 25    established political party for any special primary 26    election called for the purpose of filling a vacancy in   HB4790- 11 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    the office of representative in the United States Congress 2    where the nomination of such political party for said 3    office is uncontested. For the purposes of this Article, 4    the nomination of an established political party of a 5    candidate for election to said office shall be deemed to 6    be uncontested where not more than the number of persons 7    to be nominated have timely filed valid nomination papers 8    seeking the nomination of such established party for 9    election to said office. This subsection (b) shall not 10    apply if such primary election is conducted on a regularly 11    scheduled election day.12        (c) Notwithstanding the provisions in subparagraph (a) 13    and (b) of this paragraph (10), whenever a person who has 14    not timely filed valid nomination papers and who intends 15    to become a write-in candidate for a political party's 16    nomination for any office for which the nomination is 17    uncontested files a written statement or notice of that 18    intent with the local election official where the 19    candidate is seeking to appear on the ballot, a primary 20    ballot shall be prepared and a primary shall be held for 21    that office. Such statement or notice shall be filed on or 22    before the date established in this Article for certifying 23    candidates for the primary ballot. Such statement or 24    notice shall contain (i) the name and address of the 25    person intending to become a write-in candidate, (ii) a 26    statement that the person is a qualified primary elector   HB4790- 12 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    of the political party from whom the nomination is sought, 2    (iii) a statement that the person intends to become a 3    write-in candidate for the party's nomination, and (iv) 4    the office the person is seeking as a write-in candidate. 5    An election authority shall have no duty to conduct a 6    primary and prepare a primary ballot for any office for 7    which the nomination is uncontested unless a statement or 8    notice meeting the requirements of this Section is filed 9    in a timely manner.10        (11) If multiple sets of nomination papers are filed 11    for a candidate to the same office, the State Board of 12    Elections, appropriate election authority or local 13    election official where the petitions are filed shall 14    within 2 business days notify the candidate of his or her 15    multiple petition filings and that the candidate has 3 16    business days after receipt of the notice to notify the 17    State Board of Elections, appropriate election authority 18    or local election official that he or she may cancel prior 19    sets of petitions. If the candidate notifies the State 20    Board of Elections, appropriate election authority or 21    local election official, the last set of petitions filed 22    shall be the only petitions to be considered valid by the 23    State Board of Elections, election authority or local 24    election official. If the candidate fails to notify the 25    State Board of Elections, election authority or local 26    election official then only the first set of petitions   HB4790- 13 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    filed shall be valid and all subsequent petitions shall be 2    void.3        (12) All nominating petitions shall be available for 4    public inspection and shall be preserved for a period of 5    not less than 6 months.6(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 7103-586, eff. 5-3-24; 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (10 ILCS 5/7-12.5 new)9    Sec. 7-12.5. Reopened filing period following withdrawal 10by an incumbent.11    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, if a 12candidate who is the current holder of the elective office for 13which nomination papers have been filed withdraws his or her 14candidacy anytime up until 10 business days before the ballot 15is finalized, the State Board of Elections or the appropriate 16election authority shall reopen the filing period for that 17office.18    (b) The reopened filing period shall begin no later than 5 19business days after the withdrawal is certified and shall 20remain open for 10 business days. During the reopened filing 21period, any qualified person eligible for the office may file 22nomination papers. Nomination papers filed during the reopened 23filing period shall be subject to the same requirements, 24objections, and certification procedures as nomination papers 25filed during the original filing period.  HB4790- 14 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1    (c) This Section applies only to withdrawals by a 2candidate who is the incumbent officeholder at the time of 3withdrawal. The reopened filing period shall apply regardless 4of whether any candidates for the office remain on the ballot 5at the time of withdrawal. 6    (10 ILCS 5/10-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-8)7    Sec. 10-8. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, 8certificates of nomination and nomination papers, and 9petitions to submit public questions to a referendum, being 10filed as required by this Code, and being in apparent 11conformity with the provisions of this Code Act, shall be 12deemed to be valid unless objection thereto is duly made in 13writing within 5 business days after the last day for filing 14the certificate of nomination or nomination papers or petition 15for a public question, with the following exceptions:16        A. In the case of petitions to amend Article IV of the 17    Constitution of the State of Illinois, there shall be a 18    period of 35 business days after the last day for the 19    filing of such petitions in which objections can be filed.20        B. In the case of petitions for advisory questions of 21    public policy to be submitted to the voters of the entire 22    State, there shall be a period of 35 business days after 23    the last day for the filing of such petitions in which 24    objections can be filed.25    Any legal voter of the political subdivision or district   HB4790- 15 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1in which the candidate or public question is to be voted on, or 2any legal voter in the State in the case of a proposed 3amendment to Article IV of the Constitution or an advisory 4public question to be submitted to the voters of the entire 5State, having objections to any certificate of nomination or 6nomination papers or petitions filed, shall file an objector's 7petition together with 2 copies thereof in the principal 8office or the permanent branch office of the State Board of 9Elections, or in the office of the election authority or local 10election official with whom the certificate of nomination, 11nomination papers or petitions are on file. Objection 12petitions that do not include 2 copies thereof, shall not be 13accepted. In the case of nomination papers or certificates of 14nomination, the State Board of Elections, election authority 15or local election official shall note the day and hour upon 16which such objector's petition is filed, and shall, not later 17than 12:00 p.m. noon on the second business day after receipt 18of the petition, transmit by registered mail or receipted 19personal delivery the certificate of nomination or nomination 20papers and the original objector's petition to the chair of 21the proper electoral board designated in Section 10-9 of this 22Code hereof, or his authorized agent, and shall transmit a 23copy by registered mail or receipted personal delivery of the 24objector's petition, to the candidate whose certificate of 25nomination or nomination papers are objected to, addressed to 26the place of residence designated in said certificate of   HB4790- 16 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1nomination or nomination papers. In the case of objections to 2a petition for a proposed amendment to Article IV of the 3Constitution or for an advisory public question to be 4submitted to the voters of the entire State, the State Board of 5Elections shall note the day and hour upon which such 6objector's petition is filed and shall transmit a copy of the 7objector's petition by registered mail or receipted personal 8delivery to the person designated on a certificate attached to 9the petition as the principal proponent of such proposed 10amendment or public question, or as the proponents' attorney, 11for the purpose of receiving notice of objections. In the case 12of objections to a petition for a public question, to be 13submitted to the voters of a political subdivision, or 14district thereof, the election authority or local election 15official with whom such petition is filed shall note the day 16and hour upon which such objector's petition was filed, and 17shall, not later than 12:00 p.m. noon on the second business 18day after receipt of the petition, transmit by registered mail 19or receipted personal delivery the petition for the public 20question and the original objector's petition to the chair of 21the proper electoral board designated in Section 10-9 of this 22Code hereof, or his authorized agent, and shall transmit a 23copy by registered mail or receipted personal delivery, of the 24objector's petition to the person designated on a certificate 25attached to the petition as the principal proponent of the 26public question, or as the proponent's attorney, for the   HB4790- 17 -LRB104 20061 SPS 33512 b1purposes of receiving notice of objections.2    The objector's petition shall give the objector's name and 3residence address, and shall state fully the nature of the 4objections to the certificate of nomination or nomination 5papers or petitions in question, and shall state the interest 6of the objector and shall state what relief is requested of the 7electoral board.8    The provisions of this Section and of Sections 10-9, 910-10, and 10-10.1 shall also apply to and govern objections 10to petitions for nomination filed under Article 7 or Article 118, except as otherwise provided in Section 7-13 for cases to 12which it is applicable, and also apply to and govern petitions 13for the submission of public questions under Article 28.14    For the purposes of this Section, a vacancy includes a 15withdrawal described in Section 7-12.5. 16(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; revised 6-24-25.)